Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.06, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Traffic-control signal. (a) Whenever traffic is controlled by traffic-control signals exhibiting different colored lights, or colored lighted arrows, successively one at a time or in combination, only the colors Green, Red, and Yellow deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin are permitted tonew text end be used, except for special pedestrian signals carrying a word or deleted text begin legenddeleted text end new text begin symbolnew text end . The traffic-control signal lights or colored lighted arrows indicate and apply to drivers of vehicles and pedestrians as follows: (1) Green indication: (i) Vehicular traffic facing a circular green signal may proceed straight through or turn right or left unless a sign prohibits either turn. But vehicular traffic, including vehicles turning right or left, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end yield the right-of-way to other vehicles and to pedestrians lawfully within the intersection or adjacent crosswalk at the time this signal is exhibited. Vehicular traffic turning left or making a U-turn to the left deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end yield the right-of-way to other vehicles approaching from the opposite direction so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard. (ii) Vehicular traffic facing a green arrow signal, shown alone or in combination with another indication, may cautiously enter the intersection only to make the movement indicated by the arrow, or other movement as permitted by other indications shown at the same time. Vehicular traffic deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end yield the right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the intersection. (iii) Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal as provided in subdivision 6, pedestrians facing any green signal, except when the sole green signal is a turn arrow, may proceed across the roadway within any marked or unmarked crosswalk. Every driver of a vehicle deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end yield the right-of-way to such pedestrian, except that the pedestrian deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end yield the right-of-way to vehicles lawfully within the intersection at the time that the green signal indication is first shown. (2) Steady yellow indication: (i) Vehicular traffic facing a steady circular yellow or yellow arrow signal is thereby warned that the related green movement is being terminated or that a red indication will be exhibited immediately thereafter when vehicular traffic must not enter the intersection, except for the continued movement allowed by any green arrow indication simultaneously exhibited. (ii) Pedestrians facing a circular yellow signal, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal as provided in subdivision 6, are thereby advised that there is insufficient time to cross the roadway before a red indication is shown and deleted text begin nodeleted text end new text begin anew text end pedestrian deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin must notnew text end then start to cross the roadway. (3) Steady red indication: (i) Vehicular traffic facing a circular red signal alone must stop at a clearly marked stop line but, if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then before entering the intersection and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end remain standing until a green indication is shown, except as follows: (A) the driver of a vehicle stopped as close as practicable at the entrance to the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then at the entrance to the intersection in obedience to a red or stop signal, and with the intention of making a right turn may make the right turn, after stopping, unless an official sign has been erected prohibiting such movement, but deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end yield the right-of-way to pedestrians and other traffic lawfully proceeding as directed by the signal at that intersection; or (B) the driver of a vehicle on a one-way street intersecting another one-way street on which traffic moves to the left deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end stop in obedience to a red or stop signal and may then make a left turn into the one-way street, unless an official sign has been erected prohibiting the movement, but deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end yield the right-of-way to pedestrians and other traffic lawfully proceeding as directed by the signal at that intersection. (ii) Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal as provided in subdivision 6, pedestrians facing a steady red signal alone deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not enter the roadway. (iii) Vehicular traffic facing a steady red arrow signal, with the intention of making a movement indicated by the arrow, must stop at a clearly marked stop line but, if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then before entering the intersection and must remain standing until a permissive signal indication permitting the movement indicated by the red arrow is displayed, except as follows: when an official sign has been erected permitting a turn on a red arrow signal, the vehicular traffic facing a red arrow signal indication is permitted to enter the intersection to turn right, or to turn left from a one-way street into a one-way street on which traffic moves to the left, after stopping, but must yield the right-of-way to pedestrians and other traffic lawfully proceeding as directed by the signal at that intersection. (b) In the event an official traffic-control signal is erected and maintained at a place other than an intersection, the provisions of this section are applicable except those which can have no application. Any stop required must be made at a sign or marking on the pavement indicating where the stop must be made, but in the absence of any such sign or marking the stop must be made at the signal. (c) When a traffic-control signal indication or indications placed to control a certain movement or lane are so identified by placing a sign near the indication or indications, no other traffic-control signal indication or indications within the intersection controls vehicular traffic for that movement or lane. new text begin (d) A peace officer is prohibited from stopping, detaining, or issuing a citation to a pedestrian for a violation of paragraph (a), clause (2), item (ii), or (3), item (ii), unless: new text end new text begin (1) the officer lawfully stops or detains the pedestrian for an unrelated violation or offense; or new text end new text begin (2) at the time of the violation, a vehicle is approaching in a manner that constitutes a hazard of collision between the vehicle and the pedestrian. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.06, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Pedestrian control signal. (a) Whenever special pedestrian-control signals exhibiting the words "Walk" or "Don't Walk" or symbols of a "walking person" or "upraised hand" are in place, the signals or symbols indicate as follows: (1) A steady "Walk" signal or the symbol of a "walking person" indicates that a pedestrian facing either of these signals may proceed across the roadway in the direction of the signal, possibly in conflict with turning vehicles. Every driver of a vehicle deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end yield the right-of-way to such pedestrian except that the pedestrian deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end yield the right-of-way to vehicles lawfully within the intersection at the time that either signal indication is first shown. (2) A "Don't Walk" signal or the symbol of an "upraised hand," flashing or steady, indicates that a pedestrian deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not start to cross the roadway in the direction of either signal, but any pedestrian who has partially crossed on the "Walk" or "walking person" signal indication deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end proceed to a sidewalk or safety island while the signal is showing. (b) A pedestrian crossing a roadway in conformity with this section is lawfully within the intersection and, when in a crosswalk, is lawfully within the crosswalk. new text begin (c) A peace officer is prohibited from stopping, detaining, or issuing a citation to a pedestrian for a violation of paragraph (a), clause (2), unless: new text end new text begin (1) the officer lawfully stops or detains the pedestrian for an unrelated violation or offense; or new text end new text begin (2) at the time of the violation, a vehicle is approaching in a manner that constitutes a hazard of collision between the vehicle and the pedestrian. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.21, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Crossing between intersections. (a) Every pedestrian crossing a roadway at any point other than within a marked crosswalk or at an intersection with no marked crosswalk deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway. (b) Any pedestrian crossing a roadway at a point where a pedestrian tunnel or overhead pedestrian crossing has been provided deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway. (c) Between adjacent intersections at which traffic-control signals are in operation pedestrians deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not cross at any place except in a marked crosswalk. (d) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this sectionnew text begin ,new text end every driver of a vehicle deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end (1) exercise due care to avoid colliding with any bicycle or pedestrian upon any roadwaynew text begin ,new text end and (2) give an audible signal when necessary and exercise proper precaution upon observing any child or any obviously confused or incapacitated person upon a roadway. new text begin (e) A peace officer is prohibited from stopping, detaining, or issuing a citation to a pedestrian for a violation of paragraph (c), unless: new text end new text begin (1) the officer lawfully stops or detains the pedestrian for an unrelated violation or offense; or new text end new text begin (2) at the time of the violation, a vehicle is approaching in a manner that constitutes a hazard of collision between the vehicle and the pedestrian. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations committed on or after that date. new text end